Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Chapter 9
SECURED TRANSACTIONS

Part 1. General Provisions

Sec.

Part 2. Effectiveness of Security Agreement — Attachment of Security Interest — Rights of Parties to Security Agreement

Part 3. Perfection and Priority

28-9-322A. Security interests in crops for provision of agricultural chemicals.

Part 4. Rights of Third Parties

Part 5. Filing

28-9-516A. Filing officer duties.

Part 6. Default

Part 7. Transition

Part 8. Transition Provisions for 2011 Amendments